New York, session 2025-2026, A3441.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 42 of section 182 of the judiciary law, as 2 added by chapter 699 and as renumbered by chapter 751 of the laws of 3 1969, is amended to read as follows: 4 42. Schenectady, [one] two; 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 6 the additional county court judge shall first be elected at the general 7 election to be held on November 4, 2025 and shall take office January 1, 8 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06671-01-5